Hawaii statutes.
§464-4 Public works. (a)
Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, public works projects
involving:

(1) Alteration or new construction shall be required
to have:

(A) Plans or specifications prepared by or
under the supervision of an appropriately licensed professional engineer,
architect, or landscape architect. The licensed professional engineer,
architect, or landscape architect, as the case may be, shall stamp the plans or
specifications, and indicate that the licensee has prepared or supervised the
preparation of the plans or specifications; and

(B) A licensed professional engineer,
architect, or landscape architect designated by the State, county, or political
subdivision that is undertaking the public works project to observe the alteration
or new construction. For the observation of construction of these types of
public works projects, the licensed professional engineer, architect, or
landscape architect, as the case may be, shall not be required to stamp the
plans or specifications.

(2) Maintenance work shall:

(A) Not be required to have plans or
specifications prepared by or under the supervision of an appropriately
licensed professional engineer, architect, or landscape architect; and

(B) Be required to have a licensed professional
engineer, architect, or landscape architect designated by the State, county, or
political subdivision that is undertaking the public works project to observe
the maintenance work. For the observation of construction of this type of
public works project, the licensed professional engineer, architect, or
landscape architect, as the case may be, shall not be required to stamp the
plans or specifications.

(b) All land surveys involving property
boundaries for public purposes or plans thereof shall be made or supervised by
a licensed surveyor. The licensed land surveyor shall stamp the land surveys
or plans, and indicate that the licensee has prepared or supervised the
preparation of the land surveys or plans.

(c) For purposes of this section:

"Maintenance" means minor repairs or
replacement work which do not affect or involve the structural integrity of the
public works project.

"Public works projects" means
projects undertaken by the State, counties, or any political subdivisions
thereof. [L 1923, c 227, §9; RL 1925, §3691; am L 1931, c 165, §6; RL 1935,
§7032; RL 1945, §7604; RL 1955, §166-4; HRS §464-4; am L 1970, c 85, §1; am L
1988, c 226, §2; am L 1989, c 210, §6; am L 2002, c 53, §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next